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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC C0200 /3 1 toC02 15 / 3 4 SpeedSensorCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The speed sensor detects wheel speed and sends the ap-
propriate signals to the ECU. These signals are used for control
of theABScontrol system.The frontand rear rotorseachhave
48 serrations.
When the rotors rotate, themagnetic fieldemittedby theperma-
nent magnet in the speed sensor generates an AC voltage.
Since the frequency of this AC voltage changes in direct propor-
tion to the speed of the rotor, the frequency is used by the ECU
to detect the speed of each wheel.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C0200 /3 1
C0205 / 32
C0210 / 33
C0215 / 34

Detectionofanyofconditions ( 1) through(4):
(1)Atvehiclespeedof 12km/h (6mph)ormore,pulses

are not input for 30 secs.
(2) Momentary interruption of the speed sensor signal

occursat least7 times in the timebetweenswitching
the ignition switch ON and switching it OFF.

(3)Continuousnoiseoccurs into thespeedsensor
signalswith thevehiclespeedat20km/h ( 12mph)or
more.

(4) The condition that the speed sensor signal circuit is
open continues for 0.6 secs. or more.

SRight front, left front, right rearand left rearspeedsensor
SEachspeedsensorcircuit
SSensor rotor

HINT:
DTCNo.C0200 /3 1 is for the right frontspeedsensor.
DTC No. C0205 / 32 is for the left front speed sensor.
DTCNo.C02 10 /33 is for the right rearspeedsensor.
DTCNo.C02 15 /34 is for the left rearspeedsensor.
Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the speed sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits
ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
Start the inspection from step 1 in case of using the hand held tester and start from step 2 in case of not using
the hand held tester.

1 Check output value of speed sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand held tester main switch ON.
(c) Select the DATALIST mode on the hand held tester.
CHECK:
Check that there is no difference between the speed value output from the speed sensor displayed on the
hand held tester and the speed value displayed on the speedometer when driving the vehicle.
OK:

There is almost no difference from the displayed speed value.
HINT:
There is tolerance of ± 10 % in the speedometer indication.

OK Check and replace ABS ECU.

NG

2 Check speed sensor.

FRONT:
PREPARATION:
(a) Make sure that there is no looseness at the connector

lock part and connecting part of the connector.
(b) Disconnect speed sensor connector.
CHECK:
LH Side:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 3 of speed sensor
connector.
RH side:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of speed sensor
connector.
OK:

Resistance: 0.92 − 1.22 k�
CHECK:
LH Side:
Measure resistance between terminal 1 or 3 of speed sensor
connector and body ground.
RH Side:
Measure resistance between terminal 1 or 2 of speed sensor
connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� or higher
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REAR:
PREPARATION:
(a) Make sure that there is no looseness at the connector

lock part and connecting part of the connector.
(b) Disconnect speed sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of speed sensor
connector.
OK:

Resistance: 1.0 − 1.4 k�
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal 1 or 2 of speed sensor
connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI−312) .

OK

3 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between each speed
sensor and ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK



BR3795

W04200

Normal Signal Waveform

1 V / Division
2 m/s / Division

GND

−DIAGNOSTICS ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DI−331

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

4 Check sensor installation.

CHECK:
Check the speed sensor installation.
OK:

The installation bolt is tightened properly and there is
no clearance between the sensor and front steering
knuckle or rear axle carrier.

NG Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI−312) .

OK

5 Check speed sensor and sensor rotor serrations.

(REFERENCE) INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the ABS ECU.
(b) Connect the oscilloscope to the each of terminals FR+,

FL+, RR+ or RL+ and GND of the ABS ECU.
CHECK:
Drive the vehicle at about 20 km/h (12 mph), and check the sig-
nal waveform.

OK Check and replace ABS ECU.

NG
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6 Check sensor rotor and sensor tip.

FRONT:
PREPARATION:
(a) RFS:

Remove the steering axle shaft (See page SA−40).
(b) IFS:

Remove the front drive shaft (See page SA−49).
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:

No scratches, missing teeth or foreign objects.
PREPARATION:
Remove front speed sensor (See page BR−89).
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:

No scratches or foreign objects on the sensor tip.
REAR:
PREPARATION:
(a) RFS:

Remove the rear axle hub (See page SA−1 71).
(b) IFS:

Remove the rear axle shaft (See page SA−1 61).
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:

No scratches, missing teeth or foreign objects.
PREPARATION:
Remove rear speed sensor (See page BR−92).
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:

No scratches or foreign objects on the sensor tip.

NG Replace speed sensor or rotor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI−312) .

OK

Check and replace ABS ECU.


